Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Chapter 6 Long Term Care Choices Program

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 3 provides:

“(a) For transition services for persons leaving nursing homes or avoiding more restrictive placements, there is appropriated one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) from the general fund to the department of health for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008.

“(b) For expansion of the long term care home and community based waiver program, there is appropriated to the department of health one million fifty-four thousand three hundred seventy-seven dollars ($1,054,377.00) from the general fund and one million one hundred eighty-four thousand six hundred ninety-one dollars ($1,184,691.00) in federal funds for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008. There is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health five hundred fifty-six thousand dollars ($556,000.00) and five hundred sixty-eight thousand dollars ($568,000.00) in federal funds for additional costs to the Medicaid program.

“(c) For improvement of the reimbursement of long term care home and community based waiver program providers, there is appropriated to the department of health four hundred ninety-two thousand eight hundred dollars ($492,800.00) from the general fund and five hundred seven thousand two hundred dollars ($507,200.00) in federal funds for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008.

“(d) For expansion of the assisted living waiver slots, there is appropriated to the department of health from the general fund two hundred forty-six thousand four hundred dollars ($246,400.00) and two hundred fifty-three thousand six hundred dollars ($253,600.00) in federal funds for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008.

“(e) For the expansion of the community based in-home program, eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($850,000.00) is appropriated to the department of health from the general fund for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008.

“(f) To administer programs created by this act, for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008 there is appropriated to the department of health from the general fund ninety-four thousand eight hundred dollars ($94,800.00) and ninety-four thousand eight hundred dollars ($94,800.00) in federal funds.

“(g) Two (2) additional full-time positions are authorized to the department of health.

“(h) For purposes of the alternative eldercare grant programs created by this act, there is appropriated to the department of health from the general fund one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

§ 42-6-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Long Term Care Choices Act”.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

§ 42-6-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Adult foster care” means care in a home licensed as an adult foster home and care provided to a resident of the home while temporarily away from the adult foster home;

“Adult foster care home” means any family home or facility in which residential care is provided in a homelike environment for five (5) or fewer adults who are not related to the provider by blood, marriage or adoption, except in special circumstances. “Adult foster care home” does not include any residential facility otherwise licensed or funded by the state of Wyoming. The homes shall be regulated in accordance with W.S.

35-2-901

through

35-2-913

and this act which shall govern in case of conflict;

“Alternative eldercare home” means a facility and program which:

Provides services and care at the highest level required by a resident and as permitted under the applicable facility;

Shall be licensed as a health care facility pursuant to W.S.

35-2-901

through

35-2-913

;

Creates communities that allow long-term residents to develop lasting relationships with other residents and staff;

Maintains residences as units independent from each other;

Provides, at a minimum, a private bedroom and bathroom for each resident;

Provides services to Medicaid supported residents at the Medicaid reimbursement rates;

Maintains all common spaces within the house, including secured exterior space, accessible and open to all residents during waking hours;

Provides an office space for a nurse within each house;

Provides a common area in each house including a seating area;

Provides public and staff bathroom facilities;

Creates a residential home environment in all aspects, using residential materials and designs appropriate to the style of the community;

Is committed to a restraint free environment;

Implements a culture of learning and participation by the residents and honors the elder hood stage of life.

“Assisted living facility” means as defined in W.S. 35-2-901(a)(xxii);

“Department” means the department of health;

“Home medical testing” means medical testing designed to be done in the home of the person being tested by a person who is not a licensed health care professional and includes but is not limited to testing done using a home blood pressure monitor or a home diabetes management blood sugar monitor;

“Long term care assessment” means a form and an assessment process conforming with relevant federal regulations and designed to measure the abilities and disabilities of a person in the activities of daily living to determine the person’s need for long term care. As of January 1, 2007 the department of health form LT-101 entitled “Assessment of Medical Necessity for Long Term Care” and the assessment needed to complete it shall be the long term care assessment;

“Medicaid” means the program administered by the state pursuant to the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act and this act and partly funded by the federal government pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act;

“Nursing home” means a nursing care facility as defined in W.S. 35-2-901(a)(xvi) and licensed pursuant to Wyoming Statutes, article 9, chapter 2, title 35;

“Residential care” means the provision of room and board and services that assist the resident in activities of daily living including but not limited to bathing, dressing, grooming, eating, medication management, incontinence care, home medical testing, money management or recreation;

“This act” means W.S.

42-6-101

through

42-6-109

.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 1; 2011, ch. 188, § 2; 2015 ch. 176, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(xi), substituted “42-6-109” for “42-6-108.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a) (ii), inserted “care” preceding “home” in the first and second sentences and inserted “except in special circumstances” following “marriage or adoption” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “35-2-913” for “35-2-912” in (a)(ii) and (a)(iii)(B).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (a)(iii)(L), (a)(iii)(I) or (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

§ 42-6-103.
Rulemaking; guidance.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement this act. The rules and regulations shall seek to implement the objectives of this act by expanding the long term care system to one emphasizing consumer choice and home, home like and community based care alternatives.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

§ 42-6-104.
Alternative long term care home pilot programs authorized.

Three (3) pilot program grants are authorized to study the feasibility of innovation in long term care facilities. Eligible recipients shall include cities, counties and any entity planning for long term care needs or providing long term care including private nonprofit and private for profit entities. The department shall solicit proposals for the grants through a request for proposals developed in consultation with the advisory council on aging. The department, in consultation with the council, shall select the recipients from the proposals received. The department shall negotiate any specific provisions of the grant award needed and shall administer the grants. In selecting the recipients, the council shall:

Consider the extent to which the proposal moves the staff of the facility to a more patient centered culture;

Consider one (1) project to reconfigure an existing nursing home to achieve a resident-centered cultural change;

Fund one (1) study relating to the creation of an alternative eldercare home, as defined in W.S. 42-6-102(a)(iii), provided that an acceptable project proposal is received in response to the request for proposals;

Fund one (1) study relating to the creation of an alternative eldercare home, as defined in W.S. 42-6-102(a)(iii), which shall require that the home:

Maintains residences as units independent from other facilities such that there is no physical connection or shared roof structures between houses;

Provides a secured exterior patio or garden with covered seating for each house accessible by all residents including those with wheelchairs and assistive devices;

Provides for locked storage of hazardous materials and control of kitchen access during high traffic periods of meal preparation and clean-up;

Provides a den in each house to accommodate television viewing and limited overnight guests;

Implements a self-managed work team approach to in-house and clinical support staffing. Each house shall have its own core in-house staffing that is specific and dedicated to a single house;

Uses a home base facility for the clinical support team members that is outside and separate from the house; and

Maintains a lift free environment by providing ceiling lifts in each resident’s bedroom and bathroom.

Consider the extent to which there is a market for the proposed facility or the extent to which people in need of long term care are likely to choose the proposed facility; and

Consider the extent to which the proposed pilot project will determine the effectiveness of its approach to elder care in a timely manner.

Each grant proposal shall include plans for a local or applicant match of twenty-five percent (25%) of the grant amount.

For applicants that have completed any appropriate needs study or market study, the grant funding may be used for design and development of the facility and the organization which will operate it. If this is done, the grant recipient shall agree to accept Medicaid clients in the facility without discrimination.

The department is directed to work with grant recipients in the development of rules and regulations which are compatible with the culture of the homes and which will assure appropriate licensure for the care provided and the needs of the elder residents. The department shall inform the joint labor, health and social services interim committee if legislation is needed to authorize any necessary rules and regulations.

As a condition of receiving the grants, each grantee shall agree to provide training and reports to other parties in the state interested in innovative long term care approaches.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

§ 42-6-105.
Adult foster care homes; licensure; suspension or revocation.

The department may initiate and license an adult foster care pilot project subject to the following:

The applicant shall pay a one-time fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) which shall be deposited in the general fund;

The department, a public health nurse or other employee of a local department of health shall complete an inspection of the proposed adult foster care home;

The proposed home shall comply with all state and local building, sanitation, utility, fire and zoning codes applicable to single family dwellings;

and (v) Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 176, § 2.

The pilot program shall consist of no more than ten (10) adult foster care homes. At least three (3) of the homes shall be in counties with a population of thirty thousand (30,000) or less.

The department may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, revoke or suspend any license issued pursuant to this section, may prohibit a facility from accepting new resident clients, may place conditions on the continuation of a license, or may require a facility to take specified remedial actions within a specified time, if:

There is a threat to the health, safety or welfare of any resident client;

There is credible evidence of abuse, neglect or exploitation of any resident client;

The facility is not operated in compliance with this act or any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this act.

If, in the professional judgment of the state health officer, there is a clear and present threat to the health or safety of a resident client, the state health officer may close an adult foster care home and transfer the residents to another place. The department shall also initiate proceedings pursuant to subsection (b) of this section within three (3) working days.

The department shall complete a criminal records check on any individual employed by adult foster care homes and on any individual, other than a resident client or a resident client’s spouse, who at the time of licensure is expected to live in the adult foster care home or who, after licensure, lives or comes to live in the adult foster care home. The department may refuse to license a facility or prohibit the individual from living in the facility if he has been convicted of a felony indicating he may abuse a resident or steal from a resident.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with this act to govern the pilot project.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 2.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 1; 2015 ch. 59, § 2, effective February 26, 2015; 2015 ch. 176, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment by ch. 59, § 2, deleted former (f), pertaining to requirements for reports from the department of health to the legislature.

Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The second 2015 amendment by ch. 176, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(vi) replaced “ten (10)” for “five (5)”, in (a)(vi), (c) and (d) inserted “care.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in the first sentence of (a)(vi), substituted “adult foster care homes” for “adult care homes,” and in the first sentence of (c) substituted “adult foster care home” for “adult care home.”

Editor's notes. —

The Revisor’s Bill, Laws 2016, ch. 78, § 3, stated: “ Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

§ 42-6-106.
Home and community based waiver program expanded; requirements.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 117 § 2.

The department is authorized to increase the provider reimbursement levels by an amount up to three dollars ($3.00) per hour for hourly services or seventeen and six-tenths percent (17.6%) above the prevailing rate for nonhourly services as of December 1, 2006. The department shall report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by November 1, 2007 the extent to which reimbursement improvements and any other changes made have improved the availability of home health care services and any additional remedies that may be needed. The length of the report shall not exceed one thousand (1,000) words plus any appropriate charts and graphs. Additional reports may be made from time to time as the need arises.

The department shall set goals for expanding the number of Medicaid home and community based clients in self directed budget options and shall report progress toward those goals to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee no later than November 1, 2007, November 1, 2008 and November 1, 2009. The department shall allow these options to be managed by persons designated to do so in advanced health care directives.

Consistent with approved budgets, the department shall make available a pool of state funds to meet transitional needs of clients moving from a more restrictive to a less restrictive environment in circumstances where Medicaid funds are not available due to federal restrictions. If sufficient funds are available, these state funds may also be used to meet short term needs of clients seeking to avoid placements in more restrictive environments. The department shall govern the expenditure of these funds though contracts, policies and rules and regulations as needed.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 1; 2013 ch. 117, § 2, effective March 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (a), which read: “The department is authorized to seek from the federal government expansion of the number of slots in the home and community based waiver program from one thousand one hundred fifty (1,150) to one thousand four hundred fifty (1,450). Additional expansions may be authorized through the biennial budget.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

§ 42-6-107.
Assisted living expansion; reimbursement increase.

The department shall seek federal approval to increase the number of allowed slots in the assisted living Medicaid waiver from one hundred forty-six (146) to one hundred sixty-eight (168) slots.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

§ 42-6-108.
Adult day care.

The department shall investigate adult day care providers in Wyoming with respect to access, rates, administration of rules and regulations and their impact on providers and clients, and shall report its findings to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and to the advisory council on aging. The report shall not exceed two thousand (2,000) words in length plus appropriate charts and graphs.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 219, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2007.

§ 42-6-109.
Aging and disability resource centers.

The department is authorized, using competitive grants and contracts, to fund a statewide network of aging and disability resource centers.

Locations of the aging and disability resource centers shall be determined by the department of health, aging division. In selecting locations for aging and disability resource centers, the department of health, aging division, shall require a degree of local community funding, which may include in kind contributions, for a center.

The purpose of each center shall be to create a single, coordinated system of information and assistance for all persons seeking long term support. Each center shall assist eligible persons in making informed decisions about health care access and long term care service and support options and shall serve as a referral agency to the long term care support system. Centers shall provide information and assistance to individuals needing either public or private resources, professionals seeking assistance on behalf of their clients and individuals planning for their future long term care needs.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 59 § 2.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 188, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 59, § 2, effective February 26, 2015.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (d), substituted “shall include a report within the department's biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

concerning” for “shall provide an annual report beginning October 1, 2011, to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the joint appropriations interim committee concerning” and added “for each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years” to the end.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2011, ch. 188, § 3 provides:

“There is appropriated two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) from the general fund to the department of health. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2012. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of funding and administering aging and disability resource centers pursuant to W.S.

42-6-109

. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2012.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2011, ch. 188, § 4, provides:

“(a)

Section 3 of this act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2011.

“(b)

Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, this act is effective July 1, 2011.”